District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.03

Restrictions on the financing of single-premium credit insurance.

A lender shall not sell any individual or group credit life, accident, health, or unemployment insurance product on a prepaid single premium basis in conjunction with a covered loan. Credit insurance sold by a lender on a basis other than a prepaid single premium shall be accompanied by a clear and conspicuous disclosure, provided at least 3 days before closing, stating that the credit insurance shall not be a condition to the extension of mortgage credit and that the borrower may elect not to purchase the insurance. Insurance premiums or debt cancellation or suspension fees calculated and paid on a monthly or bi-weekly basis shall not be considered financed by the lender; provided, that the disclosure required by this section shall be provided to the borrower for any insurance, debt cancellation, or suspension services purchased by the borrower.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 203, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 203 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).